North Dakota statutes. TITLE 44 Offices and Officers
CHAPTER 44-06.1 Revised Uniform Law on Notarial Acts
44-06.1-21.
Grounds to deny, refuse to renew, revoke, suspend, or condition commission of notary public.

The secretary of state may deny or refuse to renew a notary public commission, or may revoke, suspend, or condition a notary public commission for any act or omission that demonstrates an individual lacks the honesty, integrity, competence, or reliability to act as a notary public, including:

Failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter;

Fraudulent, dishonest, or deceitful misstatement or omission in the application for a commission as a notary public submitted to the secretary of state;

A conviction of the notary public or applicant of any felony or a crime involving fraud, dishonesty, or deceit;

A finding against, or admission of liability by, the applicant or notary public in any legal proceeding or disciplinary action based on the applicant’s or notary public’s fraud, dishonesty, or deceit;

Failure by the notary public to discharge any duty or responsibility required of a notarial officer, whether by any provision in this chapter, any rules of the secretary of state, or any federal or state law;

Use of false or misleading advertising or representations by the notary public representing that the notary public has duties, rights, or privileges that a notary public does not have;

Violation by the notary public of any rule of the secretary of state regarding a notary public;

Denial, refusal to renew, revocation, suspension, or conditioning of a notary public commission in another state; or

Failure of the notary public to maintain an assurance as provided in section 44-06.1-20.

If an applicant for a commission as a notary public is denied the commission or a commission is revoked or suspended, the applicant or notary public is entitled to timely notice and hearing in accordance with chapter 28-32. The notice may provide that the person may not perform any notarial acts during the pendency of the revocation proceeding. A notary whose commission is revoked may be denied a new commission for a period of up to four years following the date of revocation.

The authority of the secretary of state to deny, suspend, refuse to renew, or revoke a notary public’s commission does not prevent the secretary of state or an aggrieved person from seeking and obtaining other remedies provided by law, whether criminal or civil.

A notary public who exercises the duties of a notary’s office with knowledge that the notary’s commission has expired or has been revoked or that the notary is disqualified otherwise or any other person who acts as a notary or performs a notarial act without a lawful notary commission is guilty of an infraction, and, if appropriate, the notary’s commission must be revoked by the secretary of state using the procedure under chapter 28-32.

The secretary of state may impose a lesser sanction for a violation of any provision of this chapter if determined appropriate by the secretary of state under the pertinent facts and circumstances. A lesser sanction includes imposition of a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred dollars or a letter of reprimand. Any civil penalty collected by the secretary of state must be deposited in the secretary of state’s general services operating fund.

Any person may file a complaint with the secretary of state seeking denial, revocation, or suspension of a commission issued or to be issued by the secretary of state. The secretary of state shall provide a complaint form. The complainant shall use that form and the form must be verified under oath by the complainant or duly authorized officer of the complainant. If the secretary of state determines that a complaint alleges facts that, if true, would require denial, revocation, or suspension of a commission, the secretary of state shall initiate a hearing without undue delay. If the secretary of state determines a complaint does not state facts warranting a hearing, the secretary of state may dismiss the complaint. The secretary of state may initiate a hearing for denial, revocation, or suspension of a commission on the secretary of state’s own motion.

Any person whose commission has been revoked or suspended may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement of the commission or termination of the suspension.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2013, ch. 340, § 3; 2017, ch. 313, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

44-06.1-22.
Database of notaries public.

When the secretary of state acquires or develops the technical capability to maintain an electronic database of notaries public, the secretary of state shall maintain an electronic database of notaries public:

Through which an individual may verify the authority of a notary public to perform notarial acts; and

Which indicates whether a notary public has notified the secretary of state that the notary public will be performing notarial acts on electronic records.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2013, ch. 340, § 4.

44-06.1-23.
Prohibited acts.

A commission as a notary public does not authorize an individual to:

Assist in drafting legal records, give legal advice, or otherwise practice law;

Act as an immigration consultant or an expert on immigration matters;

Represent an individual in a judicial or administrative proceeding relating to immigration to the United States, United States citizenship, or related matters; or

Receive compensation for performing any of the activities listed in this subsection.

A notary public may not engage in false or deceptive advertising.

A notary public, other than an attorney licensed to practice law in this state, may not use the term “notario” or “notario publico”.

A notary public, other than an attorney licensed to practice law in this state, may not advertise or represent that the notary public may assist in drafting legal records, give legal advice, or otherwise practice law. If a notary public, who is not an attorney licensed to practice law in this state, in any manner advertises or represents that the notary public offers notarial services, whether orally or in a record, including broadcast media, print media, and the internet, the notary public shall include the following statement, or an alternate statement authorized or required by the secretary of state, in the advertisement or representation, prominently and in each language used in the advertisement or representation: “I am not an attorney licensed to practice law in this state. I am not allowed to draft legal records, give advice on legal matters, including immigration, or charge a fee for those activities.” If the form of advertisement or representation is not broadcast media, print media, or the internet, and does not permit the inclusion of the statement required by this subsection because of size, it must be prominently displayed or provided at the place of performance of the notarial act before the notarial act is performed.

Except as otherwise allowed by law, a notary public may not withhold access to or possession of any original record provided by an individual who seeks performance of a notarial act by the notary public.

A notary public may not notarize a signature on a document if:

The document was not first signed or re-signed in the presence of the notary public, in the case of a verification on oath or affirmation, or in the case of an acknowledgment, was not acknowledged in the presence of the notary public.

The name of the notary public or the spouse of the notary public appears on the document as a party or in which document either individual has a direct beneficial interest or if either individual appears as a signatory to a petition within the meaning of section 1-01-50. A notarial act performed in violation of this subdivision is voidable.

The signature is that of the notary public or the spouse of the notary public.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the notary public uses a name or initial in notarizing the document other than as it appears on the notary’s commission. However, such an act by a notary by itself does not affect the validity of the document.

The date of the verification on oath or affirmation or acknowledgment is not the actual date the document is to be notarized or the verification on oath or affirmation or acknowledgment is undated.

The signature on the document or the notarial certificate is not an original signature, except as otherwise provided by law.

The notary is falsely or fraudulently signing or notarizing a document, verification on oath or affirmation, or acknowledgment or in any other way is impersonating or assuming the identity of another notary.

The signature is on a blank or incomplete document.

In the case of a document drafted in a language other than English, the document is not accompanied by a permanently affixed and accurate written English translation.

The notary did not obtain satisfactory evidence of the identity of the signer, unless the signer is personally known to the notary.

A notary public may not make or purport to make any copy of a vital record, a recordable instrument, or a public record containing an official seal if:

The document is a copy or certified copy of any vital record authorized or required by law to be registered or filed;

The document is a copy or certified copy of an instrument entitled by law to be recorded; or

The document is a copy or certified copy of a public record containing an official seal.

A notary public shall affix the notary’s official stamp at the time of performing each notarial act.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2017, ch. 313, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

44-06.1-24.
Validity of notarial acts.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the failure of a notarial officer to perform the duties or meet the requirements specified in this chapter does not invalidate a notarial act performed by the notarial officer. The validity of a notarial act under this chapter does not prevent an aggrieved person from seeking to invalidate the record or transaction that is the subject of the notarial act or from seeking other remedies based on other laws of this state or law of the United States. This section does not validate a purported notarial act performed by an individual who does not have the authority to perform the act.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-25.
Rules.

The secretary of state may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. Rules adopted regarding the performance of notarial acts with respect to electronic records may not require, or accord greater legal status or effect to, the implementation or application of a specific technology or technical specification. The rules may include:

Provisions prescribing the manner of performing notarial acts regarding tangible and electronic records.

Provisions to ensure that any change to or tampering with a record bearing a certificate of a notarial act is self-evident.

Provisions to ensure integrity in the creation, transmittal, storage, or authentication of electronic records or signatures.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-26.
Notary public commission in effect.

A commission as a notary public in effect on August 1, 2011, continues until its date of expiration. A notary public who applies to renew a notary public commission after August 1, 2011, shall comply with the provisions of this chapter. A notary public, in performing notarial acts after August 1, 2011, shall comply with the provisions of this chapter and is subject to refusal to renew the notary public’s commission or revocation or suspension of the notary public’s commission under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-27.
Name change.

A notary who has legally changed the notary’s name shall submit to the secretary of state a rider to the notary’s surety bond stating both the old and new names, the effective date of the new name, and a ten dollar fee within sixty days of the name change. After notification to the secretary of state of the name change and until a commission with the notary’s new name is received, the notary may continue to use the old stamping device but must sign any notarial certificate substantially as follows:

Notary public North Dakota Formerly known and commissioned as My commission expires Notary Seal

Click to view

Upon receipt of the rider and fee, the secretary of state shall issue a certificate of authorization that the notary public must use to obtain a new stamping device. The notary shall place an impression of the notary’s stamp on the certificate of authorization and return the certificate of authorization to the secretary of state. After the authorization is on file, the secretary of state shall issue a commission with the notary’s new name.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3; 2017, ch. 313, § 6, effective August 1, 2017.

44-06.1-28.
Fees to be charged for notarial acts — Penalty.

A notary public is entitled to charge and receive not more than five dollars per notarial act. A notary who charges a fee exceeding that amount is guilty of an infraction. It is an infraction for any person other than the notary public to impose or collect any monetary fee, charge, or commission in connection with the notarization of any document. A notary may charge a travel fee when traveling to perform a notarial act if:

The notary and the person requesting the notarial act agree upon the travel fee in advance of the travel; and

The notary explains to the person requesting the notarial act that the travel fee is both separate from the notarial fee and neither specified nor mandated by law.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-29.
Savings clause.

The provisions of this chapter do not affect the validity or effect of a notarial act performed before August 1, 2011.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.

44-06.1-30.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

The provisions of this chapter modify, limit, and supersede the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act [15 U.S.C. 7001 et seq.] but do not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that Act [15 U.S.C. 7001(c)] or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that Act [15 U.S.C. 7003(b)].

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 334, § 3.